Maryland, session 2026, SB0970.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF MARYLAND,
13 That the Laws of Maryland read as follows:
14 Article – State Government
15 9–1E–17.
16 (d) A sports wagering licensee or sports wagering operator that advertises in the
17 State [may] SHALL contract with an independent evaluator licensed under subsection (b)
18 of this section to evaluate and rate the sports wagering licensee’s sports wagering content,
19 sports wagering experts, sports wagering influencers, and content partners.
EXPLANATION: CAPITALS INDICATE MATTER ADDED TO EXISTING LAW.
[Brackets] indicate matter deleted from existing law.
Underlining indicates amendments to bill.
Strike out indicates matter stricken from the bill by amendment or deleted from the law by
amendment. *sb0970*

2 SENATE BILL 970
1 SECTION 2. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That this Act is contingent on the
2 State Lottery and Gaming Control Commission issuing licenses as required under §
3 9–1E–17 of the State Government Article to at least three independent evaluators.
4 SECTION 3. AND BE IT FURTHER ENACTED, That, subject to Section 2 of this
5 Act, this Act shall take effect July 1, 2026.
Approved:
________________________________________________________________________________
Governor.
________________________________________________________________________________
President of the Senate.
________________________________________________________________________________
Speaker of the House of Delegates.